North Carolina statutes. Chapter 132. Public Records.
§ 132-1.4A.
Law enforcement agency recordings.

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section:

Body-worn camera. — An operational video or digital camera or other electronic device, including a microphone or other mechanism for allowing audio capture, affixed to the uniform or person of law enforcement agency personnel and positioned in a way that allows the camera or device to capture interactions the law enforcement agency personnel has with others.

Custodial law enforcement agency. — The law enforcement agency that owns or leases or whose personnel operates the equipment that created the recording at the time the recording was made.

Dashboard camera. — A device or system installed or used in a law enforcement agency vehicle that electronically records images or audio depicting interaction with others by law enforcement agency personnel. This term does not include body-worn cameras.

Disclose or disclosure. — To make a recording available for viewing or listening to by the person requesting disclosure, at a time and location chosen by the custodial law enforcement agency. This term does not include the release of a recording.

Personal representative. — A parent, court-appointed guardian, spouse, or attorney licensed in North Carolina of a person whose image or voice is in the recording. If a person whose image or voice is in the recording is deceased, the term also means the personal representative of the estate of the deceased person; the deceased person’s surviving spouse, parent, or adult child; the deceased person’s attorney licensed in North Carolina; or the parent or guardian of a surviving minor child of the deceased.

Recording. — A visual, audio, or visual and audio recording captured by a body-worn camera, a dashboard camera, or any other video or audio recording device operated by or on behalf of a law enforcement agency or law enforcement agency personnel when carrying out law enforcement responsibilities. This term does not include any video or audio recordings of interviews regarding agency internal investigations or interviews or interrogations of suspects or witnesses.

Release. — To provide a copy of a recording.

Serious bodily injury. — A bodily injury that creates a substantial risk of death, or that causes serious permanent disfigurement, coma, a permanent or protracted condition that causes extreme pain, or permanent or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ, or that results in prolonged hospitalization.

Public Record and Personnel Record Classification. — Recordings are not public records as defined by

G.S. 132-1

. Recordings are not personnel records as defined in Part 7 of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes,

G.S. 160A-168

, or

G.S. 153A-98

.

(b1)

Immediate Disclosure. —

When requested by submission of the notarized form described in subsection (b2) of this section to the head of a law enforcement agency, any portion of a recording in the custody of a law enforcement agency which depicts a death or serious bodily injury shall, upon order of the court pursuant to subsection (b3) of this section, be disclosed to a personal representative of the deceased, the injured individual, or a personal representative on behalf of the injured individual. Any disclosure ordered by the court pursuant to subsection (b3) of this section shall be done by the agency in a private setting. A person who receives disclosure as ordered by the court pursuant to subsection (b3) of this section shall not record or copy the recording. Except as provided in subsection (b3) of this section, the portion of the recording relevant to the death or serious bodily injury shall not be edited or redacted.

(b2)

Notarized Form. —

A person requesting disclosure pursuant to subsection (b1) of this section must submit a signed and notarized form provided by the law enforcement agency. The form shall be developed by the Administrative Office of the Courts and shall include notice that, if disclosed, the recording may not be recorded or copied, or if unlawfully recorded or copied may not be knowingly disseminated, and notice of the criminal penalties provided in subsection (b4) of this section.

(b3)

Immediate Disclosure Review. —

No later than three business days from receipt of the notarized form requesting immediate disclosure pursuant to subsection (b1) of this section, a law enforcement agency shall file a petition in the superior court in any county where any portion of the recording was made for issuance of a court order regarding disclosure of the recording requested pursuant to subsection (b1) of this section and shall also deliver a copy of the petition and a copy of the recording, which shall remain confidential unless the court issues an order of disclosure pursuant to this section, to the senior resident superior court judge for that superior court district or their designee. There shall be no fee for filing the petition. The court shall conduct an in-camera review of the recording and shall enter an order within seven business days of the filing of the petition instructing that the recording be (i) immediately disclosed without editing or redaction; (ii) immediately disclosed with editing or redaction; (iii) disclosed at a later date, with or without editing or redaction; or (iv) not disclosed to the person or persons seeking disclosure. In determining whether the recording may be disclosed pursuant to this section, the court shall consider the following factors:

If the person requesting disclosure of the recording is a person authorized to receive disclosure pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

If the recording contains information that is otherwise confidential or exempt from disclosure or release under State or federal law.

If disclosure would reveal information regarding a person that is of a highly sensitive and personal nature.

If disclosure may harm the reputation or jeopardize the safety of a person.

If disclosure would create a serious threat to the fair, impartial, and orderly administration of justice.

If confidentiality is necessary to protect either an active or inactive internal or criminal investigation or potential internal or criminal investigation.In any proceeding pursuant to this subsection, the following persons shall be notified and those persons, or their designated representative, shall be given an opportunity to be heard at any proceeding: (i) the head of the custodial law enforcement agency, (ii) any law enforcement agency personnel whose image or voice is in the portion of the recording requested to be disclosed and the head of that person’s employing law enforcement agency, (iii) the District Attorney, (iv) the investigating law enforcement agency, and (v) the party requesting the disclosure. The court may order any conditions or restrictions on the disclosure that the court deems appropriate.Petitions filed pursuant to this subsection shall be scheduled for hearing as soon as practicable, and the court shall issue an order pursuant to the provisions of this subsection no later than seven business days after the filing of the petition. Any subsequent proceedings in such actions shall be accorded priority by the trial and appellate courts.If disclosure of a recording is denied based on subdivision (6) of this subsection, the court shall schedule a subsequent hearing, to be held no more than 20 business days after the issuance of the order, to reconsider whether the recording should be disclosed.

(b4)

Any person who willfully records, copies, or attempts to record or copy a recording disclosed pursuant to subsection (b1) of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any person who knowingly disseminates a recording or a copy of a recording disclosed pursuant to subsection (b1) of this section is guilty of a Class I felony.

Disclosure; General. — Recordings in the custody of a law enforcement agency shall be disclosed only as provided by this section. Recordings depicting a death or serious bodily injury shall only be disclosed as provided in subsections (b1) through (b3) of this section.A person requesting disclosure of a recording must make a written request to the head of the custodial law enforcement agency that states the date and approximate time of the activity captured in the recording or otherwise identifies the activity with reasonable particularity sufficient to identify the recording to which the request refers.The head of the custodial law enforcement agency may only disclose a recording to the following:

A person whose image or voice is in the recording.

A personal representative of an adult person whose image or voice is in the recording, if the adult person has consented to the disclosure.

A personal representative of a minor or of an adult person under lawful guardianship whose image or voice is in the recording.

A personal representative of a deceased person whose image or voice is in the recording.

A personal representative of an adult person who is incapacitated and unable to provide consent to disclosure.

When disclosing the recording, the law enforcement agency shall disclose only those portions of the recording that are relevant to the person’s request. A person who receives disclosure pursuant to this subsection shall not record or copy the recording.

Disclosure; Factors for Consideration. — Upon receipt of the written request for disclosure, as promptly as possible, the custodial law enforcement agency must either disclose the portion of the recording relevant to the person’s request or notify the requestor of the custodial law enforcement agency’s decision not to disclose the recording to the requestor.The custodial law enforcement agency may consider any of the following factors in determining if a recording is disclosed:

If the person requesting disclosure of the recording is a person authorized to receive disclosure pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

If the recording contains information that is otherwise confidential or exempt from disclosure or release under State or federal law.

If disclosure would reveal information regarding a person that is of a highly sensitive personal nature.

If disclosure may harm the reputation or jeopardize the safety of a person.

If disclosure would create a serious threat to the fair, impartial, and orderly administration of justice.

If confidentiality is necessary to protect either an active or inactive internal or criminal investigation or potential internal or criminal investigation.

Appeal of Disclosure Denial. — If a law enforcement agency denies disclosure pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, or has failed to provide disclosure more than three business days after the request for disclosure, the person seeking disclosure may apply to the superior court in any county where any portion of the recording was made for a review of the denial of disclosure. The court may conduct an in-camera review of the recording. The court may order the disclosure of the recording only if the court finds that the law enforcement agency abused its discretion in denying the request for disclosure. The court may only order disclosure of those portions of the recording that are relevant to the person’s request. A person who receives disclosure pursuant to this subsection shall not record or copy the recording. An order issued pursuant to this subsection may not order the release of the recording.In any proceeding pursuant to this subsection, the following persons shall be notified and those persons, or their designated representative, shall be given an opportunity to be heard at any proceeding: (i) the head of the custodial law enforcement agency, (ii) any law enforcement agency personnel whose image or voice is in the recording and the head of that person’s employing law enforcement agency, and (iii) the District Attorney. Actions brought pursuant to this subsection shall be set down for hearing as soon as practicable, and subsequent proceedings in such actions shall be accorded priority by the trial and appellate courts.

Release of Recordings to Certain Persons; Expedited Process. — Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (g) of this section, a person authorized to receive disclosure pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, or the custodial law enforcement agency, may petition the superior court in any county where any portion of the recording was made for an order releasing the recording to a person authorized to receive disclosure. There shall be no fee for filing the petition which shall be filed on a form approved by the Administrative Office of the Courts and shall state the date and approximate time of the activity captured in the recording, or otherwise identify the activity with reasonable particularity sufficient to identify the recording. If the petitioner is a person authorized to receive disclosure, notice and an opportunity to be heard shall be given to the head of the custodial law enforcement agency. Petitions filed pursuant to this subsection shall be set down for hearing as soon as practicable and shall be accorded priority by the court.The court shall first determine if the person to whom release of the recording is requested is a person authorized to receive disclosure pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. In making this determination, the court may conduct an in-camera review of the recording and may, in its discretion, allow the petitioner to be present to assist in identifying the image or voice in the recording that authorizes disclosure to the person to whom release is requested. If the court determines that the person is not authorized to receive disclosure pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, there shall be no right of appeal and the petitioner may file an action for release pursuant to subsection (g) of this section.If the court determines that the person to whom release of the recording is requested is a person authorized to receive disclosure pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the court shall consider the standards set out in subsection (g) of this section and any other standards the court deems relevant in determining whether to order the release of all or a portion of the recording. The court may conduct an in-camera review of the recording. The court shall release only those portions of the recording that are relevant to the person’s request and may place any conditions or restrictions on the release of the recording that the court, in its discretion, deems appropriate.

Release of Recordings; General; Court Order Required. — Recordings in the custody of a law enforcement agency shall only be released pursuant to court order. Any custodial law enforcement agency or any person requesting release of a recording may file an action in the superior court in any county where any portion of the recording was made for an order releasing the recording. The request for release must state the date and approximate time of the activity captured in the recording, or otherwise identify the activity with reasonable particularity sufficient to identify the recording to which the action refers. The court may conduct an in-camera review of the recording. In determining whether to order the release of all or a portion of the recording, in addition to any other standards the court deems relevant, the court shall consider the applicability of all of the following standards:

Release is necessary to advance a compelling public interest.

The recording contains information that is otherwise confidential or exempt from disclosure or release under State or federal law.

The person requesting release is seeking to obtain evidence to determine legal issues in a current or potential court proceeding.

Release would reveal information regarding a person that is of a highly sensitive personal nature.

Release may harm the reputation or jeopardize the safety of a person.

Release would create a serious threat to the fair, impartial, and orderly administration of justice.

Confidentiality is necessary to protect either an active or inactive internal or criminal investigation or potential internal or criminal investigation.

There is good cause shown to release all portions of a recording.

The court shall release only those portions of the recording that are relevant to the person’s request, and may place any conditions or restrictions on the release of the recording that the court, in its discretion, deems appropriate.In any proceeding pursuant to this subsection, the following persons shall be notified and those persons, or their designated representative, shall be given an opportunity to be heard at any proceeding: (i) the head of the custodial law enforcement agency, (ii) any law enforcement agency personnel whose image or voice is in the recording and the head of that person’s employing law enforcement agency, and (iii) the District Attorney. Actions brought pursuant to this subsection shall be set down for hearing as soon as practicable, and subsequent proceedings in such actions shall be accorded priority by the trial and appellate courts.

Release of Recordings; Law Enforcement Purposes. — Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (c), (f), and (g) of this section, a custodial law enforcement agency shall disclose or release a recording to a district attorney (i) for review of potential criminal charges, (ii) in order to comply with discovery requirements in a criminal prosecution, (iii) for use in criminal proceedings in district court, or (iv) for any other law enforcement purpose, and may disclose or release a recording for any of the following purposes:

For law enforcement training purposes.

Within the custodial law enforcement agency for any administrative, training, or law enforcement purpose.

To another law enforcement agency for law enforcement purposes.

For suspect identification or apprehension.

To locate a missing or abducted person.

Retention of Recordings. — Any recording subject to the provisions of this section shall be retained for at least the period of time required by the applicable records retention and disposition schedule developed by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, Division of Archives and Records.

Agency Policy Required. — Each law enforcement agency that uses body-worn cameras or dashboard cameras shall adopt a policy applicable to the use of those cameras.

No civil liability shall arise from compliance with the provisions of this section, provided that the acts or omissions are made in good faith and do not constitute gross negligence, willful or wanton misconduct, or intentional wrongdoing.

Fee for Copies. — A law enforcement agency may charge a fee to offset the cost incurred by it to make a copy of a recording for release. The fee shall not exceed the actual cost of making the copy.

Attorneys’ Fees. — The court may not award attorneys’ fees to any party in any action brought pursuant to this section.

History.

2016-88, s. 1; 2019-48, s. 1; 2021-138, s. 21(a).

Cross References.

As to various provisions pertaining to SBI and State Crime Laboratory access to view and analyze recordings, see Article 8A of Chapter 15A,

G.S. 114-64

,

G.S. 153A-436.1

, and

G.S. 160A-490.1

.

Grants for Law Enforcement Cameras.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 16.7(a)-(c), as amended by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 16.1(a), provides: “(a)
Funds appropriated in S.L. 2015-241 and S.L. 2017-57 to the Department of Public Safety for body-worn camera grants shall not revert but shall be used as follows:

“(1) Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to Samarcand Training Academy for upgrades to its training simulator to support school safety.

“(2) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association to be used to provide grants to implement a statewide sex offender database that connects all 100 counties and allows for robust data entry and retrieval at the local level.

“(3) The remaining funds to provide matching grants to local and county law enforcement agencies in counties with a population of less than 75,000 according to the latest federal decennial census to purchase and place into service body-worn or dashboard video cameras, as defined by

G.S. 132-1.4

A, and for training and related expenses. These grant funds shall be administered by the Governor’s Crime Commission, which shall develop guidelines and procedures for the administration and distribution of grants to those agencies. These guidelines and procedures shall include the following requirements and limitations:

“a. The maximum grant amount shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

“b. Grantees shall be required to have appropriate policies and procedures in place governing the operation of body-worn or dashboard cameras, as defined by

G.S. 132-1.4

A, and the proper storage of images recorded with those cameras.

“(b) The Governor’s Crime Commission shall submit a report on the grant funds distributed pursuant to this section to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety as follows:

“(1) For the 2017-2018 fiscal year, no later than August 1, 2018.

“(2) For the 2018-2019 fiscal year, no later than August 1, 2019.

“(b1) No later than July 1, 2019, the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association shall submit to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety a report on the use of the grant funds distributed pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section.

“(c) Definition. — The term ‘body-worn camera’ means an operational video camera, including a microphone or other mechanism for allowing audio capture, affixed to a law enforcement officer’s uniform and positioned in a way that allows the video camera to capture interactions the law enforcement officer has with the public.”

§ 132-1.5.
911 database.

Automatic number identification and automatic location identification information that consists of the name, address, and telephone numbers of telephone subscribers, or the e-mail addresses of subscribers to an electronic emergency notification or reverse 911 system, that is contained in a county or municipal 911 database, or in a county or municipal telephonic or electronic emergency notification or reverse 911 system, is confidential and is not a public record as defined by Chapter 132 of the General Statutes if that information is required to be confidential by the agreement with the telephone company by which the information was obtained. Dissemination of the information contained in the 911, electronic emergency notification or reverse 911 system, or automatic number and automatic location database is prohibited except on a call-by-call basis only for the purpose of handling emergency calls or for training, and any permanent record of the information shall be secured by the public safety answering points and disposed of in a manner which will retain that security except as otherwise required by applicable law.

History.

1997-287, s. 1; 2007-107, s. 3.2(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-107, s. 3.2.(a), effective June 26, 2007, substituted “subscribers, or the e-mail addresses of subscribers to an electronic emergency notification or reverse 911 system, that is contained in a county or municipal 911 database, or in a county or municipal telephonic or electronic emergency notification or reverse 911 system,” for “subscribers which contained in a county 911 database” near the beginning of the section; and inserted “electronic emergency notification or reverse 911 system, or” near the middle of the section.

§ 132-1.6.
Emergency response plans.

Emergency response plans adopted by a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, a community college, or a public hospital as defined in

G.S. 159-39

and the records related to the planning and development of these emergency response plans are not public records as defined by

G.S. 132-1

and shall not be subject to inspection and examination under

G.S. 132-6

.

History.

2001-500, s. 3.1.

§ 132-1.7.
Sensitive public security information.

Public records, as defined in

G.S. 132-1

, shall not include information containing specific details of public security plans and arrangements or the detailed plans and drawings of public buildings and infrastructure facilities or plans, schedules, or other documents that include information regarding patterns or practices associated with executive protection and security.

(a1)

Public records, as defined in

G.S. 132-1

, shall not include specific security information or detailed plans, patterns, or practices associated with prison operations.

(a2)

Public records, as defined in G.S. 132-1, shall not include specific security information or detailed plans, patterns, or practices to prevent or respond to criminal, gang, or organized illegal activity.

Public records as defined in

G.S. 132-1

do not include plans to prevent or respond to terrorist activity, to the extent such records set forth vulnerability and risk assessments, potential targets, specific tactics, or specific security or emergency procedures, the disclosure of which would jeopardize the safety of governmental personnel or the general public or the security of any governmental facility, building, structure, or information storage system.

(b1)

Public records shall not include mobile telephone numbers issued by a local, county, or State government to any of the following:

A sworn law enforcement officer or nonsworn employee of a public law enforcement agency.

An employee of a fire department.

Any employee whose duties include responding to an emergency.

Information relating to the general adoption of public security plans and arrangements, and budgetary information concerning the authorization or expenditure of public funds to implement public security plans and arrangements, or for the construction, renovation, or repair of public buildings and infrastructure facilities shall be public records.

History.

2001-516, s. 3; 2003-180, s. 1; 2015-225, s. 3; 2015-241, s. 16A.5.

§ 132-1.7A.
Alarm registration information.

A public record, as defined by

G.S. 132-1

, does not include any registration or sensitive security information received or compiled by a city pursuant to an alarm registration ordinance. For purposes of this section, the term “alarm registration ordinance” means an ordinance adopted by a city that requires owners of security, burglar, fire, or similar alarm systems to register with the city. Information that is deemed confidential under this section and is not open to public inspection, examination, or copying includes registration information, including the name, home and business telephone number, and any other personal identifying information provided by an applicant pursuant to an alarm registration ordinance, and any sensitive security information pertaining to an applicant’s alarm system, including residential or office blueprints, alarm system schematics, and similar drawings or diagrams.

History.

2015-189, s. 1.

§ 132-1.8.
Confidentiality of photographs and video or audio recordings made pursuant to autopsy.

Except as otherwise provided in

G.S. 130A-389.1

, a photograph or video or audio recording of an official autopsy is not a public record as defined by

G.S. 132-1

. However, the text of an official autopsy report, including any findings and interpretations prepared in accordance with G.S. 130A-389(a), is a public record and fully accessible by the public. For purposes of this section, an official autopsy is an autopsy performed pursuant to G.S. 130A-389(a).

History.

2005-393, s. 1.

§ 132-1.9.
Trial preparation materials.

Scope. — A request to inspect, examine, or copy a public record that is also trial preparation material is governed by this section, and, to the extent this section conflicts with any other provision of law, this section applies.

Right to Deny Access. — Except as otherwise provided in this section, a custodian may deny access to a public record that is also trial preparation material. If the denial is based on an assertion that the public record is trial preparation material that was prepared in anticipation of a legal proceeding that has not commenced, the custodian shall, upon request, provide a written justification for the assertion that the public record was prepared in anticipation of a legal proceeding.

Trial Preparation Material Prepared in Anticipation of a Legal Proceeding. — Any person who is denied access to a public record that is also claimed to be trial preparation material that was prepared in anticipation of a legal proceeding that has not yet been commenced may petition the court pursuant to

G.S. 132-9

for determination as to whether the public record is trial preparation material that was prepared in anticipation of a legal proceeding.

During a Legal Proceeding. —

When a legal proceeding is subject to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 26(b)(3), or subject to Rule 26(b)(3) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, a party to the pending legal proceeding, including any appeals and postjudgment proceedings, who is denied access to a public record that is also claimed to be trial preparation material that pertains to the pending proceeding may seek access to such record only by motion made in the pending legal proceeding and pursuant to the procedural and substantive standards that apply to that proceeding. A party to the pending legal proceeding may not directly or indirectly commence a separate proceeding for release of such record pursuant to

G.S. 132-9

in any other court or tribunal.

When a legal proceeding is not subject to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 26(b)(3), and not subject to Rule 26(b)(3) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, a party to the pending legal proceeding, including any appeals and postjudgment proceedings, who is denied access to a public record that is also claimed to be trial preparation material that pertains to the pending legal proceeding may petition the court pursuant to

G.S. 132-9

for access to such record. In determining whether to require the custodian to provide access to all or any portion of the record, the court or other tribunal shall apply the provisions of G.S. 1A-1, Rule 26(b)(3).

Any person who is denied access to a public record that is also claimed to be trial preparation material and who is not a party to the pending legal proceeding to which such record pertains, and who is not acting in concert with or as an agent for any party to the pending legal proceeding, may petition the court pursuant to G.S. 132-9 for a determination as to whether the public record is trial preparation material.

Following a Legal Proceeding. — Upon the conclusion of a legal proceeding, including the completion of all appeals and postjudgment proceedings, or, in the case where no legal proceeding has been commenced, upon the expiration of all applicable statutes of limitations and periods of repose, the custodian of a public record that is also claimed to be trial preparation material shall permit the inspection, examination, or copying of such record if any law that is applicable so provides.

Effect of Disclosure. — Disclosure pursuant to this section of all or any portion of a public record that is also trial preparation material, whether voluntary or pursuant to an order issued by a court, or issued by an officer in an administrative or quasi-judicial legal proceeding, shall not constitute a waiver of the right to claim that any other document or record constitutes trial preparation material.

Trial Preparation Materials That Are Not Public Records. — This section does not require disclosure, or authorize a court to require disclosure, of trial preparation material that is not also a public record or that is under other provisions of this Chapter exempted or protected from disclosure by law or by an order issued by a court, or by an officer in an administrative or quasi-judicial legal proceeding.

Definitions. — As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

Legal proceeding. — Civil proceedings in any federal or State court. Legal proceeding also includes any federal, State, or local government administrative or quasi-judicial proceeding that is not expressly subject to the provisions of Chapter 1A of the General Statutes or the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.

Trial preparation material. — Any record, wherever located and in whatever form, that is trial preparation material within the meaning of

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 26(b)(3), any comparable material prepared for any other legal proceeding, and any comparable material exchanged pursuant to a joint defense, joint prosecution, or joint interest agreement in connection with any pending or anticipated legal proceeding.

History.

2005-332, s. 1; 2005-414, s. 4.